apertium-hye.hye.dix
    <pardef n="ձի__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>ուց</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ու</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>եր</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>երն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="թեկնածու__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ների</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ները</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="երեխա__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>յից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ների</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ները</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ներն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="տար/ի__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>վանից</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>վա</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>վան</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ում</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներից</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իների</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներին</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներում</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներով</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներ</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իները</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իներն</l><r>ի<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="տարի"><i>տար</i><par n="տար/ի__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="երե"><i>երե</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ձի"><i>ձի</i><par n="ձի__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="փեսացու"><i>փեսացու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="եղջերու"><i>եղջերու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ճիճու"><i>ճիճու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="քահանա"><i>քահանա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="կենգուրու"><i>կենգուրու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ղպտի"><i>ղպտի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ուտի"><i>ուտի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հանի"><i>հանի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="նվագածու"><i>նվագածու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="անարի"><i>անարի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ընտանի"><i>ընտանի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ձեռնածու"><i>ձեռնածու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մարգարե"><i>մարգարե</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="յանիչարի" r="LR"><p><l>յանիչարի</l><r>ենիչերի</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="շիմպանզե"><i>շիմպանզե</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="արծվի" r="LR"><p><l>արծվի</l><r>արծիվ</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ամուրի"><i>ամուրի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="զոմբի"><i>զոմբի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="գնչու"><i>գնչու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հարսնացու"><i>հարսնացու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="ափու" r="LR"><p><l>ափու</l><r>ափի</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="աղա"><i>աղա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="կոլիբրի"><i>կոլիբրի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="գետաձի"><i>գետաձի</i><par n="ձի__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="տիրացու"><i>տիրացու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ափի"><i>ափի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="դասատու"><i>դասատու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="արու"><i>արու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="էրե" r="LR"><p><l>էրե</l><r>երե</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="ենիչարի" r="LR"><p><l>ենիչարի</l><r>ենիչերի</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ատտա"><i>ատտա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="վագրաձի"><i>վագրաձի</i><par n="ձի__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="թեկնածու"><i>թեկնածու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ազերի"><i>ազերի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="բանսարկու"><i>բանսարկու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հրեա"><i>հրեա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="օդաչու"><i>օդաչու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="բազե"><i>բազե</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="վկա"><i>վկա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
<e lm="տատի" r="LR"><p><l>տատի</l><r>տատ</r></p><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="երեխա"><i>երեխա</i><par n="երեխա__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ենիչերի"><i>ենիչերի</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="վերակացու"><i>վերակացու</i><par n="թեկնածու__n_aa"/></e>
